Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1227
Budget; publication required.

A summary of the prepared yearly budget of an educational service unit shall be published one time in a legal newspaper published in or of general circulation in each county in the unit at least five days before a meeting at which such budget shall be considered for adoption by the board. Such publication shall also specify the date, time, and place of the public hearing at which the budget will be considered and any tax levy made.

Laws 1969, c. 700, § 2, p. 2699;

Laws 1990, LB 1090, § 38;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2210.02;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 944.